District of Columbia statutes.
44-922

Rules.

The Mayor may issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter in accordance with subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-226, § 3, 46 DCR 500
1981 Ed., § 32-632.